Missouri, session 2026, SB1231.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 143.121, RSMo, is repealed and one new
2 section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 143.121,
3 to read as follows:
1 143.121. 1. The Missouri adjusted gross income of a
2 resident individual shall be the taxpayer's federal adjusted
3 gross income subject to the modifications in this section.
4 2. There shall be added to the taxpayer's federal
5 adjusted gross income:
6 (1) The amount of any federal income tax refund
7 received for a prior year which resulted in a Missouri
8 income tax benefit. The amount added pursuant to this
9 subdivision shall not include any amount of a federal income
10 tax refund attributable to a tax credit reducing a
11 taxpayer's federal tax liability pursuant to Public Law 116-
12 136 or 116-260, enacted by the 116th United States Congress,
13 for the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and
14 ending on or before December 31, 2020, and deducted from
15 Missouri adjusted gross income pursuant to section 143.171.
16 The amount added under this subdivision shall also not
17 include any amount of a federal income tax refund
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1231 2
18 attributable to a tax credit reducing a taxpayer's federal
19 tax liability under any other federal law that provides
20 direct economic impact payments to taxpayers to mitigate
21 financial challenges related to the COVID-19 pandemic, and
22 deducted from Missouri adjusted gross income under section
23 143.171;
24 (2) Interest on certain governmental obligations
25 excluded from federal gross income by 26 U.S.C. Section 103
26 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. The previous
27 sentence shall not apply to interest on obligations of the
28 state of Missouri or any of its political subdivisions or
29 authorities and shall not apply to the interest described in
30 subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section. The amount
31 added pursuant to this subdivision shall be reduced by the
32 amounts applicable to such interest that would have been
33 deductible in computing the taxable income of the taxpayer
34 except only for the application of 26 U.S.C. Section 265 of
35 the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. The reduction shall
36 only be made if it is at least five hundred dollars;
37 (3) The amount of any deduction that is included in
38 the computation of federal taxable income pursuant to 26
39 U.S.C. Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code as amended
40 by the Job Creation and Worker Assistance Act of 2002 to the
41 extent the amount deducted relates to property purchased on
42 or after July 1, 2002, but before July 1, 2003, and to the
43 extent the amount deducted exceeds the amount that would
44 have been deductible pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 168 of
45 the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as in effect on January 1,
46 2002;
47 (4) The amount of any deduction that is included in
48 the computation of federal taxable income for net operating
49 loss allowed by 26 U.S.C. Section 172 of the Internal

SB 1231 3
50 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, other than the deduction
51 allowed by 26 U.S.C. Section 172(b)(1)(G) and 26 U.S.C.
52 Section 172(i) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
53 amended, for a net operating loss the taxpayer claims in the
54 tax year in which the net operating loss occurred or carries
55 forward for a period of more than twenty years and carries
56 backward for more than two years. Any amount of net
57 operating loss taken against federal taxable income but
58 disallowed for Missouri income tax purposes pursuant to this
59 subdivision after June 18, 2002, may be carried forward and
60 taken against any income on the Missouri income tax return
61 for a period of not more than twenty years from the year of
62 the initial loss; and
63 (5) For nonresident individuals in all taxable years
64 ending on or after December 31, 2006, the amount of any
65 property taxes paid to another state or a political
66 subdivision of another state for which a deduction was
67 allowed on such nonresident's federal return in the taxable
68 year unless such state, political subdivision of a state, or
69 the District of Columbia allows a subtraction from income
70 for property taxes paid to this state for purposes of
71 calculating income for the income tax for such state,
72 political subdivision of a state, or the District of
73 Columbia;
74 (6) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
75 2018, any interest expense paid or accrued in a previous
76 taxable year, but allowed as a deduction under 26 U.S.C.
77 Section 163, as amended, in the current taxable year by
78 reason of the carryforward of disallowed business interest
79 provisions of 26 U.S.C. Section 163(j), as amended. For the
80 purposes of this subdivision, an interest expense is
81 considered paid or accrued only in the first taxable year

SB 1231 4
82 the deduction would have been allowable under 26 U.S.C.
83 Section 163, as amended, if the limitation under 26 U.S.C.
84 Section 163(j), as amended, did not exist;
85 (7) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
86 2022, the amount deducted by the taxpayer under 26 U.S.C.
87 Section 174(a)(2)(B), as amended, for the tax year.
88 3. There shall be subtracted from the taxpayer's
89 federal adjusted gross income the following amounts to the
90 extent included in federal adjusted gross income:
91 (1) Interest received on deposits held at a federal
92 reserve bank or interest or dividends on obligations of the
93 United States and its territories and possessions or of any
94 authority, commission or instrumentality of the United
95 States to the extent exempt from Missouri income taxes
96 pursuant to the laws of the United States. The amount
97 subtracted pursuant to this subdivision shall be reduced by
98 any interest on indebtedness incurred to carry the described
99 obligations or securities and by any expenses incurred in
100 the production of interest or dividend income described in
101 this subdivision. The reduction in the previous sentence
102 shall only apply to the extent that such expenses including
103 amortizable bond premiums are deducted in determining the
104 taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income or included in the
105 taxpayer's Missouri itemized deduction. The reduction shall
106 only be made if the expenses total at least five hundred
107 dollars;
108 (2) The portion of any gain, from the sale or other
109 disposition of property having a higher adjusted basis to
110 the taxpayer for Missouri income tax purposes than for
111 federal income tax purposes on December 31, 1972, that does
112 not exceed such difference in basis. If a gain is
113 considered a long-term capital gain for federal income tax

SB 1231 5
114 purposes, the modification shall be limited to one-half of
115 such portion of the gain;
116 (3) The amount necessary to prevent the taxation
117 pursuant to this chapter of any annuity or other amount of
118 income or gain which was properly included in income or gain
119 and was taxed pursuant to the laws of Missouri for a taxable
120 year prior to January 1, 1973, to the taxpayer, or to a
121 decedent by reason of whose death the taxpayer acquired the
122 right to receive the income or gain, or to a trust or estate
123 from which the taxpayer received the income or gain;
124 (4) Accumulation distributions received by a taxpayer
125 as a beneficiary of a trust to the extent that the same are
126 included in federal adjusted gross income;
127 (5) The amount of any state income tax refund for a
128 prior year which was included in the federal adjusted gross
129 income;
130 (6) The portion of capital gain specified in section
131 135.357 that would otherwise be included in federal adjusted
132 gross income;
133 (7) The amount that would have been deducted in the
134 computation of federal taxable income pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
135 Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code as in effect on
136 January 1, 2002, to the extent that amount relates to
137 property purchased on or after July 1, 2002, but before July
138 1, 2003, and to the extent that amount exceeds the amount
139 actually deducted pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 168 of the
140 Internal Revenue Code as amended by the Job Creation and
141 Worker Assistance Act of 2002;
142 (8) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
143 2005, the amount of any income received for military service
144 while the taxpayer serves in a combat zone which is included
145 in federal adjusted gross income and not otherwise excluded

SB 1231 6
146 therefrom. As used in this section, "combat zone" means any
147 area which the President of the United States by Executive
148 Order designates as an area in which Armed Forces of the
149 United States are or have engaged in combat. Service is
150 performed in a combat zone only if performed on or after the
151 date designated by the President by Executive Order as the
152 date of the commencing of combat activities in such zone,
153 and on or before the date designated by the President by
154 Executive Order as the date of the termination of combatant
155 activities in such zone;
156 (9) For all tax years ending on or after July 1, 2002,
157 with respect to qualified property that is sold or otherwise
158 disposed of during a taxable year by a taxpayer and for
159 which an additional modification was made under subdivision
160 (3) of subsection 2 of this section, the amount by which
161 additional modification made under subdivision (3) of
162 subsection 2 of this section on qualified property has not
163 been recovered through the additional subtractions provided
164 in subdivision (7) of this subsection;
165 (10) For all tax years beginning on or after January
166 1, 2014, the amount of any income received as payment from
167 any program which provides compensation to agricultural
168 producers who have suffered a loss as the result of a
169 disaster or emergency, including the:
170 (a) Livestock Forage Disaster Program;
171 (b) Livestock Indemnity Program;
172 (c) Emergency Assistance for Livestock, Honeybees, and
173 Farm-Raised Fish;
174 (d) Emergency Conservation Program;
175 (e) Noninsured Crop Disaster Assistance Program;
176 (f) Pasture, Rangeland, Forage Pilot Insurance Program;
177 (g) Annual Forage Pilot Program;

SB 1231 7
178 (h) Livestock Risk Protection Insurance Plan;
179 (i) Livestock Gross Margin Insurance Plan;
180 (11) For all tax years beginning on or after January
181 1, 2018, any interest expense paid or accrued in the current
182 taxable year, but not deducted as a result of the limitation
183 imposed under 26 U.S.C. Section 163(j), as amended. For the
184 purposes of this subdivision, an interest expense is
185 considered paid or accrued only in the first taxable year
186 the deduction would have been allowable under 26 U.S.C.
187 Section 163, as amended, if the limitation under 26 U.S.C.
188 Section 163(j), as amended, did not exist;
189 (12) One hundred percent of any retirement benefits
190 received by any taxpayer as a result of the taxpayer's
191 service in the Armed Forces of the United States, including
192 reserve components and the National Guard of this state, as
193 defined in 32 U.S.C. Sections 101(3) and 109, and any other
194 military force organized under the laws of this state;
195 (13) For all tax years beginning on or after January
196 1, 2022, one hundred percent of any federal, state, or local
197 grant moneys received by the taxpayer if the grant money was
198 disbursed for the express purpose of providing or expanding
199 access to broadband internet to areas of the state deemed to
200 be lacking such access;
201 (14) For all tax years beginning on or after January
202 1, 2022, the amount of specified research or experimental
203 expenditures that are both required to be charged to capital
204 account and actually are charged to capital account as
205 required by 26 U.S.C. Section 174(a)(2)(A), as amended, for
206 the tax year, after any reduction to that amount under 26
207 U.S.C. Section 280C(c), as amended;
208 (15) (a) For all tax years beginning on or after
209 January 1, 2025, one hundred percent of all income reported

SB 1231 8
210 as a capital gain for federal income tax purposes by an
211 individual subject to tax pursuant to section 143.011; and
212 (b) For all tax years beginning on or after January
213 first of the tax year following the tax year in which the
214 top rate of tax imposed pursuant to section 143.011 is equal
215 to or less than four and one-half percent, one hundred
216 percent of all income reported as a capital gain for federal
217 income tax purposes by an entity subject to tax pursuant to
218 section 143.071; and
219 [(15)] (16) For all tax years beginning on or after
220 January 1, 2026, the portion of capital gain on the sale or
221 exchange of specie, as that term is defined in section
222 408.010, that are otherwise included in the taxpayer's
223 federal adjusted gross income.
224 4. There shall be added to or subtracted from the
225 taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income the taxpayer's
226 share of the Missouri fiduciary adjustment provided in
227 section 143.351.
228 5. There shall be added to or subtracted from the
229 taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income the modifications
230 provided in section 143.411.
231 6. In addition to the modifications to a taxpayer's
232 federal adjusted gross income in this section, to calculate
233 Missouri adjusted gross income there shall be subtracted
234 from the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income any gain
235 recognized pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 1033 of the
236 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, arising from
237 compulsory or involuntary conversion of property as a result
238 of condemnation or the imminence thereof.
239 7. (1) As used in this subsection, "qualified health
240 insurance premium" means the amount paid during the tax year
241 by such taxpayer for any insurance policy primarily

SB 1231 9
242 providing health care coverage for the taxpayer, the
243 taxpayer's spouse, or the taxpayer's dependents.
244 (2) In addition to the subtractions in subsection 3 of
245 this section, one hundred percent of the amount of qualified
246 health insurance premiums shall be subtracted from the
247 taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income to the extent the
248 amount paid for such premiums is included in federal taxable
249 income. The taxpayer shall provide the department of
250 revenue with proof of the amount of qualified health
251 insurance premiums paid.
252 8. (1) Beginning January 1, 2014, in addition to the
253 subtractions provided in this section, one hundred percent
254 of the cost incurred by a taxpayer for a home energy audit
255 conducted by an entity certified by the department of
256 natural resources under section 640.153 or the
257 implementation of any energy efficiency recommendations made
258 in such an audit shall be subtracted from the taxpayer's
259 federal adjusted gross income to the extent the amount paid
260 for any such activity is included in federal taxable
261 income. The taxpayer shall provide the department of
262 revenue with a summary of any recommendations made in a
263 qualified home energy audit, the name and certification
264 number of the qualified home energy auditor who conducted
265 the audit, and proof of the amount paid for any activities
266 under this subsection for which a deduction is claimed. The
267 taxpayer shall also provide a copy of the summary of any
268 recommendations made in a qualified home energy audit to the
269 department of natural resources.
270 (2) At no time shall a deduction claimed under this
271 subsection by an individual taxpayer or taxpayers filing
272 combined returns exceed one thousand dollars per year for

SB 1231 10
273 individual taxpayers or cumulatively exceed two thousand
274 dollars per year for taxpayers filing combined returns.
275 (3) Any deduction claimed under this subsection shall
276 be claimed for the tax year in which the qualified home
277 energy audit was conducted or in which the implementation of
278 the energy efficiency recommendations occurred. If
279 implementation of the energy efficiency recommendations
280 occurred during more than one year, the deduction may be
281 claimed in more than one year, subject to the limitations
282 provided under subdivision (2) of this subsection.
283 (4) A deduction shall not be claimed for any otherwise
284 eligible activity under this subsection if such activity
285 qualified for and received any rebate or other incentive
286 through a state-sponsored energy program or through an
287 electric corporation, gas corporation, electric cooperative,
288 or municipally owned utility.
289 9. The provisions of subsection 8 of this section
290 shall expire on December 31, 2020.
291 10. (1) As used in this subsection, the following
292 terms mean:
293 (a) "Beginning farmer", a taxpayer who:
294 a. Has filed at least one but not more than ten
295 Internal Revenue Service Schedule F (Form 1040) Profit or
296 Loss From Farming forms since turning eighteen years of age;
297 b. Is approved for a beginning farmer loan through the
298 USDA Farm Service Agency Beginning Farmer direct or
299 guaranteed loan program;
300 c. Has a farming operation that is determined by the
301 department of agriculture to be new production agriculture
302 but is the principal operator of a farm and has substantial
303 farming knowledge; or

SB 1231 11
304 d. Has been determined by the department of
305 agriculture to be a qualified family member;
306 (b) "Farm owner", an individual who owns farmland and
307 disposes of or relinquishes use of all or some portion of
308 such farmland as follows:
309 a. A sale to a beginning farmer;
310 b. A lease or rental agreement not exceeding ten years
311 with a beginning farmer; or
312 c. A crop-share arrangement not exceeding ten years
313 with a beginning farmer;
314 (c) "Qualified family member", an individual who is
315 related to a farm owner within the fourth degree by blood,
316 marriage, or adoption and who is purchasing or leasing or is
317 in a crop-share arrangement for land from all or a portion
318 of such farm owner's farming operation.
319 (2) (a) In addition to all other subtractions
320 authorized in this section, a taxpayer who is a farm owner
321 who sells all or a portion of such farmland to a beginning
322 farmer may subtract from such taxpayer's Missouri adjusted
323 gross income an amount to the extent included in federal
324 adjusted gross income as provided in this subdivision.
325 (b) Subject to the limitations in paragraph (c) of
326 this subdivision, the amount that may be subtracted shall be
327 equal to the portion of capital gains received from the sale
328 of such farmland that such taxpayer receives in the tax year
329 for which such taxpayer subtracts such capital gain.
330 (c) A taxpayer may subtract the following amounts and
331 percentages per tax year in total capital gains received
332 from the sale of such farmland under this subdivision:
333 a. For the first two million dollars received, one
334 hundred percent;

SB 1231 12
335 b. For the next one million dollars received, eighty
336 percent;
337 c. For the next one million dollars received, sixty
338 percent;
339 d. For the next one million dollars received, forty
340 percent; and
341 e. For the next one million dollars received, twenty
342 percent.
343 (d) The department of revenue shall prepare an annual
344 report reviewing the costs and benefits and containing
345 statistical information regarding the subtraction of capital
346 gains authorized under this subdivision for the previous tax
347 year including, but not limited to, the total amount of all
348 capital gains subtracted and the number of taxpayers
349 subtracting such capital gains. Such report shall be
350 submitted before February first of each year to the
351 committee on agriculture policy of the Missouri house of
352 representatives and the committee on agriculture, food
353 production and outdoor resources of the Missouri senate, or
354 the successor committees.
355 (3) (a) In addition to all other subtractions
356 authorized in this section, a taxpayer who is a farm owner
357 who enters a lease or rental agreement for all or a portion
358 of such farmland with a beginning farmer may subtract from
359 such taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income an amount to
360 the extent included in federal adjusted gross income as
361 provided in this subdivision.
362 (b) Subject to the limitation in paragraph (c) of this
363 subdivision, the amount that may be subtracted shall be
364 equal to the portion of cash rent income received from the
365 lease or rental of such farmland that such taxpayer receives

SB 1231 13
366 in the tax year for which such taxpayer subtracts such
367 income.
368 (c) No taxpayer shall subtract more than twenty-five
369 thousand dollars per tax year in total cash rent income
370 received from the lease or rental of such farmland under
371 this subdivision.
372 (4) (a) In addition to all other subtractions
373 authorized in this section, a taxpayer who is a farm owner
374 who enters a crop-share arrangement on all or a portion of
375 such farmland with a beginning farmer may subtract from such
376 taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income an amount to the
377 extent included in federal adjusted gross income as provided
378 in this subdivision.
379 (b) Subject to the limitation in paragraph (c) of this
380 subdivision, the amount that may be subtracted shall be
381 equal to the portion of income received from the crop-share
382 arrangement on such farmland that such taxpayer receives in
383 the tax year for which such taxpayer subtracts such income.
384 (c) No taxpayer shall subtract more than twenty-five
385 thousand dollars per tax year in total income received from
386 the lease or rental of such farmland under this subdivision.
387 (5) The department of agriculture shall, by rule,
388 establish a process to verify that a taxpayer is a beginning
389 farmer for purposes of this section and shall provide
390 verification to the beginning farmer and farm seller of such
391 farmer's and seller's certification and qualification for
392 the exemption provided in this subsection.
✓